Georgia, session 2025_26, HB536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 536
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
18 SECTION 1.
19 Short title.
20 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Facilities Authority of the City of
21 Fairburn Act."
22 SECTION 2.
23 Definitions.
24 As used in this Act, the following words and terms shall have the meaning specified unless
25 the context or use clearly indicates a different meaning or intent:
26 (1) "Authority" means the Public Facilities Authority of the City of Fairburn created by
27 this Act.
28 (2) "City" means the City of Fairburn, Georgia, or its successor.
29 (3) "Cost of the project" shall include:
30 (A) The cost of construction;
31 (B) The cost of all land and interests therein, properties, rights, easements, and
32 franchises acquired;
33 (C) The cost of acquiring, constructing, or erecting buildings, improvements, materials,
34 labor, and services;
35 (D) The cost of all fixtures, furnishings, machinery, and equipment;
36 (E) Issuance costs, including, but not limited to fees or discounts of underwriters or
37 placement agents, the funding of reserve accounts, financing charges including interest
38 prior to and during the construction or acquisition of any project and for up to one year
39 after such project is placed into service and operational at the level intended;
40 (F) The cost of construction, engineering, architectural, fiscal, accounting, inspection,
41 and legal expenses relating to a project or to the financing or refinancing of any project
H. B. 536
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
42 and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability
43 of any project; and
44 (G) Administrative expenses relating to any project or the financing or refinancing
45 thereof, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing or
46 refinancing of a project herein authorized; the acquisition, construction, renovation,
47 reconstruction, or remodeling of a project; and the placing of the same in operation.
48 Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded
49 as part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of any funds
50 of the authority, including proceeds of any revenue bonds or other obligations issued
51 under the provisions hereof for any such project or projects and the proceeds of the sale
52 of any contracts, lease agreements, or installment sales agreements or the amounts
53 payable thereunder, either directly or by the creation of interests therein.
54 (4) "County" means Fulton County, Georgia.
55 (5) "Obligations" means and includes revenue bonds, bond anticipation notes, other
56 promissory notes, certificates of participation, custodial receipts, or other similar
57 instruments creating interests in any contracts, lease agreements, or installment sales
58 agreements or in the amounts payable to the authority, directly or indirectly, thereunder.
59 (6) "Private person" means any individual or any legal entity, other than a public body,
60 whether operated for profit or not for profit.
61 (7) "Project" means any capital project located or to be located in the city that is
62 determined by the authority to promote the public good or general welfare of the citizens
63 of the city, of the county, or of the state, or any of its enterprises or systems, including,
64 but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, renovation, improvement, extension,
65 addition, or equipping within the city of:
66 (A) Utility systems and improvements, including without limitation water and sewer
67 systems and facilities, sewage and solid waste disposal systems and facilities, and
68 electric, gas, and other similar facilities and systems;
H. B. 536
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
69 (B) Emergency facilities, including emergency, fire, police, and rescue facilities and
70 equipment;
71 (C) Recreational facilities, including parks, athletic fields, buildings, or facilities and
72 other similar facilities or related equipment;
73 (D) Public safety facilities, including prisons, jails, police stations, facilities, or
74 equipment, and state patrol or other law enforcement facilities or equipment;
75 (E) Educational, cultural, or historical facilities and equipment;
76 (F) Administrative facilities or equipment, including city hall buildings and other
77 governmental buildings; and
78 (G) Courthouses, public libraries, and other facilities to be leased or subleased,
79 operated, or otherwise used by the authority or any other public body or any private
80 person.
81 (8) "Public bodies" means and includes any county, political subdivision, or municipality
82 of the state, and any state or local government agency, department, authority, agency,
83 board, or instrumentality, each being a "public body."
84 (9) "Revenue bonds" means revenue bonds issued by the authority pursuant to the terms
85 of this Act or under Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., known as the
86 "Revenue Bond Law."
87 (10) "State" means the State of Georgia.
88 SECTION 3.
89 Creation of authority; purpose.
90 There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the "Public Facilities Authority
91 of the City of Fairburn," which shall be deemed to be a public corporation. Such corporation
92 shall be separate and distinct from any public corporation or other entity heretofore created
93 by the General Assembly and shall be an instrumentality of the State of Georgia exercising
H. B. 536
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
94 governmental and proprietary powers. The authority is created for the purpose of promoting
95 the public good and general welfare of the citizens of the city, and financing and providing
96 facilities, equipment, and services within the city, for sale to, lease or sublease to, or
97 operation by any public body or any private person. In connection with the exercise of any
98 of its powers, the members of the authority may make findings or determinations that the
99 exercise of its powers as proposed will promote the public good and general welfare, and
100 assist public bodies in providing facilities, equipment, and services in the city, and such
101 findings or determinations, if made, shall be conclusive and binding and shall not be subject
102 to review.
103 SECTION 4.
104 Powers of the authority.
105 The authority shall have the power:
106 (1) To sue and be sued;
107 (2) To have and to use a seal and to alter the same at its pleasure;
108 (3) To acquire, construct, purchase, hold, own, lease as lessee, expand, improve,
109 renovate, repair, maintain, and operate real and personal property or interests therein;
110 (4) To enter into contacts for operation, management, maintenance, and repair of any of
111 its property;
112 (5) To sell, lease as lessor, or otherwise transfer, pledge, or dispose of any real and
113 personal property or interests therein. In connection with any such lease, sale, transfer,
114 assignment, or other disposition, the authority need not comply with any other provision
115 of law requiring public bidding or any notice to the public of such lease, sale, transfer,
116 assignment, or other disposition;
117 (6) To exercise the powers conferred upon a "public corporation" or a "public authority"
118 by Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, such authority
H. B. 536
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
119 being expressly declared to be a "public corporation" or a "public authority" within the
120 meaning of such provision of the Constitution of Georgia;
121 (7) To acquire projects and other property in its own name by gift or by purchase on such
122 terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper. If the authority shall
123 deem it expedient to construct any project on real property or any interest therein or
124 usufruct therein which is subject to the control of any other public body, then such other
125 public body is hereby authorized to convey or lease such real property or interest therein
126 to the authority for no consideration or for such consideration as may be agreed upon by
127 the authority and such other public body, taking into consideration the public benefit to
128 be derived from such conveyance, lease, or usufruct. Any public body may transfer such
129 real property or interest therein without regard to any determination as to whether or not
130 such property or interest therein is surplus;
131 (8) To accept gifts and bequests for its corporate purposes;
132 (9) To appoint, select, and employ, with or without bidding as the authority may choose,
133 officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction
134 experts, fiscal agents, underwriters or other advisors, and attorneys, and to fix their
135 compensation;
136 (10) To make and execute with one or more public bodies and private persons contracts,
137 lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements, and other instruments
138 relating to the property of the authority and incident to the exercise of the powers of the
139 authority, including contracts for constructing, renting, leasing, and selling its projects
140 for the benefit of other public bodies and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing,
141 authority is specifically granted to the authority and to other public bodies to enter into
142 contracts, lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements, and related
143 agreements with each other relating to the provision of any project or services for a term
144 not exceeding 50 years, as provided in Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I(a) of the
145 Constitution of Georgia;
H. B. 536
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
146 (11) To be a co-owner, along with other public bodies or, to the extent allowed by the
147 Constitution of the state, private persons of any property, if the authority finds and
148 determines that such co-ownership is in the best interests of the authority and will serve
149 the public purposes of the authority;
150 (12) To purchase policies of insurance as may be deemed appropriate for its corporate
151 purposes;
152 (13) To operate, lease, sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any property, real or
153 personal, or assets of the authority, or to assign its rights under its contracts, lease
154 agreements, or installment sale agreements or its right to receive payments thereunder,
155 either directly or through trust or custodial arrangements whereby interests are created
156 in such contracts, lease agreements, or installment sale agreements or the payments to be
157 received thereunder through the issuance of trust certificates, certificates of participation,
158 custodial receipts, or other similar instruments. In connection with any such lease, sale,
159 transfer, assignment, or other disposition, the authority need not comply with any other
160 provision of law requiring public bidding or any notice to the public of such lease, sale,
161 transfer, assignment, or other disposition;
162 (14) To accept loans and grants of money or property of any kind from the United States
163 or any public body or private person, and all public bodies are authorized to make grants
164 to the authority, subject to any limitations in the Constitution of Georgia;
165 (15) To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to issue revenue bonds and
166 other obligations payable from funds or revenues of the authority pledged for that
167 purpose and to pledge and assign any of its revenues, income, rents, charges, and fees to
168 provide for the payment of the same and to provide for the rights of the holders of such
169 obligations;
170 (16) To enter into:
171 (A) Interest rate swaps, collars, or other types of interest rate management agreements;
172 or
H. B. 536
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
173 (B) Credit enhancement or liquidity agreements relating to any obligations of the
174 authority, provided that the obligation of the authority under such agreements shall not
175 be a general obligation of the authority but shall be a limited obligation of the authority
176 payable from a specific source of funds identified for such purpose;
177 (17) To make such rules and regulations governing its employees and property as it may
178 in its discretion deem proper;
179 (18) To be sued the same as any private corporation on any contractual obligation of the
180 authority. The authority shall have the same rights to sue any other person or entity as
181 any private corporation;
182 (19) To issue revenue bonds or other obligations to finance or refinance any project
183 which may be financed by the city; and
184 (20) To have and exercise the usual powers of private corporations, except such as are
185 inconsistent with this Act, and to do any and all things necessary and convenient to
186 accomplish the purpose and powers of the authority as herein stated.
187 SECTION 5.
188 Members of the authority; terms of office.
189 Each person who is serving on the board of directors of the Development Authority of the
190 City of Fairburn shall be by virtue of such office also a member of the authority and shall
191 serve on the governing board of the authority so long as such person serves on the board of
192 directors of the Development Authority of the City of Fairburn. The members of the
193 authority shall hold office for terms coinciding with their terms on the board of directors of
194 the Development Authority of the City of Fairburn. In the event that the number of members
195 of the board of directors of the Development Authority of the City of Fairburn is changed,
196 then the number of members of the authority shall be correspondingly changed. Immediately
197 after their official seating on the board of directors of the Development Authority of the City
H. B. 536
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
198 of Fairburn, each member of the authority shall enter upon their duties. A majority of the
199 members of the authority holding office at any time shall constitute a quorum, and no
200 vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all the rights and
201 perform all the duties of the authority and, in every instance, a majority vote of a quorum
202 shall authorize any legal act of the authority, including all things necessary to authorize and
203 issue revenue bonds and other obligations. The authority shall elect one of its members as
204 chairperson, and from its membership shall elect a secretary and a treasurer. The authority
205 may elect one of its members as a vice chairperson and may elect any number of assistant
206 secretaries or treasurers, who need not be members of the authority, as it may from time to
207 time deem necessary or desirable. The members of the authority shall not be entitled to
208 compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily
209 incurred in the performance of their duties. The authority may make rules and regulations
210 for its own governance, and it shall have perpetual existence. Any change in name or
211 composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under the
212 provisions of this Act or impair the obligations of any contracts existing under this Act.
213 SECTION 6.
214 Issuance and sale of revenue bonds and other obligations.
215 The authority shall have the power and is authorized from time to time to provide for the
216 issuance and sale of negotiable revenue bonds in the manner provided by Article 3 of
217 Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., known as the "Revenue Bond Law," and may issue
218 other obligations for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more
219 projects, including the cost of constructing, reconstructing, equipping, extending, adding to,
220 or improving any such project, or for the purpose of refunding, as herein provided, any such
221 bonds or other obligations of the authority or to refund bonds or other obligations of any
222 other authority or public body previously issued to finance or refinance the cost of a project.
H. B. 536
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
223 The principal of and interest on such revenue bonds or other obligations shall be a limited
224 obligation of the authority payable solely from the source or sources of funds specified in the
225 indenture or resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of such revenue bonds or
226 other obligations. Such revenue bonds or other obligations shall mature on such dates, bear
227 interest at such rate or rates, whether fixed or variable, be subject to redemption, and have
228 such other terms as the authority may provide in the indenture or resolution relating thereto.
229 Such revenue bonds or other obligations shall not be subject to any provision of state law
230 limiting the rate of interest payable thereon and may be sold in a negotiated sale or in a
231 public sale as the authority may determine. Such revenue bonds or other obligations may be
232 issued for cash, property, or other consideration and may be sold in a negotiated sale or in
233 a public sale at such price on such terms as the authority may determine. The offer, sale, or
234 issuance of the authority's revenue bonds or other obligations (including any separate
235 securities securing the same) shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10
236 of the O.C.G.A., the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008," as the same may be amended
237 from time to time.
238 SECTION 7.
239 Revenue bonds or other obligations not a debt or general obligation.
240 Revenue bonds or other obligations issued under the provisions of this Act or any loan
241 incurred as authorized herein shall not constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of
242 any other public body, but shall be payable solely from the sources as may be designated in
243 the resolution or indenture of the authority authorizing the issuance of the same. The
244 issuance of such obligations shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate any public
245 body to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatsoever for the payment thereof, unless
246 otherwise provided by an intergovernmental contract executed by such public body. No
247 holder of any bond or other obligation or receiver or trustee in connection therewith shall
H. B. 536
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
248 have the right to enforce the payment thereof against any property of any other public body
249 nor shall any such bond or other obligation constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal
250 or equitable, upon any such property unless otherwise provided by an intergovernmental
251 contract executed by such other public body and the authority. All such obligations shall
252 contain on their face a recital setting forth substantially the foregoing provisions of this
253 section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any other public body from
254 obligating itself to pay the amounts required under any intergovernmental contract entered
255 into with the authority pursuant to Article IX of the Constitution of Georgia or any successor
256 provision, including (if such other public body has taxing power) from funds received from
257 taxes to be levied and collected by such other public body for that purpose and from any
258 other source.
259 SECTION 8.
260 Issuance of bonds or obligations under indentures or resolutions.
261 In the discretion of the authority, any issuance of such revenue bonds or other obligations
262 may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a trustee, which may
263 be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the
264 state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign fees, tolls, rents, revenues, and earnings to
265 be received by the authority including the proceeds derived from the financing, sale, or lease,
266 or operation from time to time, of any project. Either the resolution providing for the
267 issuance of revenue bonds or other obligations or such trust indenture may contain such
268 provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the owners of such bonds
269 or obligations as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including
270 covenants setting forth the duties of the authority or any lessee or purchaser in relation to the
271 acquisition and construction of any project; the maintenance, operation, repair, and financing
272 of any project; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys, including the
H. B. 536
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
273 proceeds derived from the sale or lease of any project or from the sale of any such revenue
274 bonds or other obligations; and may contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any,
275 upon which additional bonds or other obligations may be issued, whether on a parity with or
276 subordinate to any other obligations issued by the authority. Such indenture or resolution
277 may set forth the rights and remedies of the owners of such obligations and of the trustee.
278 In addition to the foregoing, such trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the
279 authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the owners of such bonds or
280 other obligations or otherwise necessary or convenient in connection with the issuance of
281 such obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated
282 as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by such
283 indenture.
284 SECTION 9.
285 Security for the payment of bonds or other obligations.
286 The authority may assign or pledge any property, or revenues and its interest in any
287 contracts, lease agreements, or installment sales agreements, or the amounts payable
288 thereunder, to the payment of the principal and interest on revenue bonds and other
289 obligations of the authority as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or other
290 obligations or the trust indenture may provide. The use and disposition of such property or
291 revenues assigned to the payment of bonds or other obligations shall be subject to the
292 indenture or resolution authorizing the issuance of such revenue bonds or obligations. Any
293 lien created by the authority for the payment of such bonds or obligations may be a first lien
294 or a subordinate lien as the authority may provide, and any such indenture or resolution may
295 provide, at the option of the authority, for the issuance of additional bonds or other
296 obligations sharing any lien on a parity or subordinate lien basis.
H. B. 536
- 12 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
297 SECTION 10.
298 Refunding bonds or obligations.
299 The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of obligations, whether
300 revenue bonds or other obligations, for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds or other
301 obligations issued under the provisions of this Act or under any other provision of state law
302 so long as such bonds or other obligations were issued for a purpose or project for which the
303 authority could issue bonds or other obligations. The issuance of such refunding bonds or
304 other obligations and all the details thereof, the rights of holders thereof, and the duties of the
305 authority with respect to the same shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this Act
306 insofar as the same may be applicable.
307 SECTION 11.
308 Principal office; venue.
309 The principal office of the authority shall be in the City of Fairburn, and the venue of any
310 action against it shall be in Fulton County. Service upon the authority of any process,
311 subpoena, or summons shall be effected by serving the same personally upon any member
312 of the authority.
313 SECTION 12.
314 Validation of revenue bonds; elective validation of other obligations.
315 Revenue bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the
316 procedure now or hereafter set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A.,
317 known as the "Revenue Bond Law," as the same now exists or may hereafter be amended.
318 At the election of the authority, other obligations of the authority may be validated as if they
H. B. 536
- 13 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
319 were revenue bonds. The petition for validation shall name the authority as a defendant and
320 may also make a party defendant to such action any other private person or public body that
321 has or will contract with the authority with respect to the project for which revenue bonds or
322 other obligations are to be issued and are sought to be validated. The bonds or other
323 obligations, when validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with
324 respect to the validity of such bonds or other obligations and the security therefor against the
325 authority and other parties to the validation and against all other private persons and public
326 bodies, regardless of whether such private persons or public bodies were parties to such
327 validation proceedings. Any action pertaining to the validation of any revenue bonds or
328 other obligations issued under the provisions of this Act and for the validation of any
329 instruments entered or to be entered into by the authority or other private persons or public
330 bodies securing the same shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, and such
331 court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions.
332 SECTION 13.
333 No impairment of rights.
334 While any of the bonds or other obligations issued by the authority or any interests in
335 contracts of the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority
336 or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that
337 will affect adversely the interest and rights of the holders of such bonds or obligations or
338 such interests in contracts of the authority. The provisions of this section of this Act shall
339 be for the benefit of the authority and of the holders of any such bonds or obligations and
340 interests in contracts of the authority and, upon the issuance of bonds or obligations or the
341 creation of interests in contracts of the authority under the provisions of this Act, shall
342 constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds or obligations or such interests in
343 contracts of the authority.
H. B. 536
- 14 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
344 SECTION 14.
345 Trust funds; permitted investments.
346 All moneys received by the authority pursuant to this Act, whether as proceeds from the sale
347 of revenue bonds or obligations of the authority, as grants or other contributions, or as
348 revenues, income, fees, and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied
349 solely as provided in this Act and in such resolutions and trust indentures as may be adopted
350 and entered into by the authority pursuant to this Act. Any such moneys or funds may be
351 invested from time to time in such investments as may be permitted under the indenture,
352 agreement, or resolution establishing the fund or account in which such funds are held, or if
353 not held in such a fund or account, in such investments as would be permitted for
354 investments of a development authority created under Code Section 36-62-1, et seq. of the
355 O.C.G.A.
356 SECTION 15.
357 Power to set rates, fees, and charges.
358 The authority is authorized to operate, sell, or lease any project and to prescribe and fix rates,
359 fees, tolls, rents, and charges and to revise, from time to time, and collect such revised rates,
360 fees, tolls, rents, and charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished, including
361 leases, concessions, and subleases of its projects, and to determine the price and terms at and
362 under which its projects may be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of. The authority may
363 establish in its discretion procedures for contracting for any work done for the authority or
364 for the acquisition, sale, transfer, lease, management, or operation of any property, real or
365 personal, of the authority. The authority may contract with others, including private persons,
366 for services relating to the management, operation, sale, or leasing of any project.
H. B. 536
- 15 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
367 SECTION 16.
368 Revenue bonds or other obligations exempt from taxation.
369 All revenue bonds or other obligation issued as provided in this Act are declared to be issued
370 or incurred for an essential public and governmental purpose and such obligations and the
371 interest thereon shall be exempt from all taxation within this state.
372 SECTION 17.
373 Essential governmental function; no taxes or assessments.
374 All property or interests in property owned by the authority shall be public property held and
375 owned for governmental purposes and such property and all interests therein shall be exempt
376 from ad valorem taxation. The exercise of the powers conferred upon the authority
377 hereunder shall constitute an essential governmental function for a public purpose and the
378 authority shall not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired
379 by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the
380 operation and maintenance of property acquired by it, or of buildings acquired or erected by
381 it, or any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such property or buildings or other
382 income received by the authority. The tax exemption herein provided shall include an
383 exemption from any tax on rents from the leasing or subleasing of any project or other
384 property of the authority, but shall not include an exemption from sales and use tax on
385 property purchased by or for the use of the authority.
H. B. 536
- 16 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
386 SECTION 18.
387 Immunity of authority and members.
388 The authority shall have the same immunity and exemption from liability for torts and
389 negligence as the city and the officers, agents, and employees of the authority, when in the
390 performance of the work of the authority, shall have the same immunity and exemption from
391 liability for torts and negligence as the officers, agents, and employees of the city.
392 SECTION 19.
393 Authority property not subject to levy and sale.
394 The property of the authority shall not be subject to levy and sale under legal process, except
395 this provision shall not preclude a sale or foreclosure of any property under the terms of any
396 deed to secure debt, mortgage, assignment, or security agreement that the authority has
397 executed.
398 SECTION 20.
399 Authority area of operation.
400 The scope of the authority's operations shall be limited to the territory embraced within the
401 territorial limits of the city, as the same now or may hereafter exist; provided, however, that
402 nothing in this section shall prevent the authority from contracting with any entity or body,
403 public or private, outside of the city with respect to any project located in the city or located
404 outside of the city in furtherance of its public purposes.
H. B. 536
- 17 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
405 SECTION 21.
406 Supplemental powers.
407 This Act does not in any way take away from the authority any power which may be
408 conferred upon it by law but is supplemental thereto.
409 SECTION 22.
410 No power to impose taxes or exercise power of eminent domain.
411 The authority shall not have the right to impose any tax on any person or property and shall
412 not have the right to exercise the power of eminent domain.
413 SECTION 23.
414 Conveyance of property upon dissolution.
415 Should the authority for any reason be dissolved after full payment of all revenue bonds and
416 other obligations of the authority and the termination of any leases, contracts, or options to
417 which the authority is a party, the interest and any redemption premiums thereon, title to the
418 items of property, and funds of the authority held at the time of dissolution shall, prior to
419 such dissolution, be conveyed and transferred to such one or more public bodies, as the
420 authority shall elect.
421 SECTION 24.
422 Act to be liberally construed.
423 This Act shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.
H. B. 536
- 18 -

25 LC 62 0067/AP
424 SECTION 25.
425 Severability of provisions.
426 Should any sentence, clause, phrase, or part of this Act be declared for any reason to be
427 unconstitutional or invalid, the same shall not affect the remainder of this Act, or any part
428 hereof, other than the part so held to be invalid, but the remaining provisions of this Act shall
429 remain in full force and effect, and it is the express intention of this Act to enact each
430 provision of this Act independently of any other provision hereof.
431 SECTION 26.
432 Effective date.
433 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
434 without such approval.
435 SECTION 27.
436 Conflicting laws.
437 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 536
- 19 -